it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale > Componenti per pattini in linea: Cuscinetti per pattini in linea; Freni per pattini in linea; Fibbie e cinghie per pattini in linea; Telai per pattini in linea; Hardware per pattini in linea; Lacci per pattini in linea; Scarpette interne per pattini in linea; Strumenti per pattini in linea; Ruote per pattini in linea
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas > Proteções para patinagem com patins em linha: Rolamentos de patins em linha; Travões para patins em linha; Fivelas e tiras para patins em linha; Chassi para patins em linha; Ferragens para patins em linha; Atacadores para patins em linha; Botins interiores para patins em linha; Ferramentas para patins em linha; Rodas para patins em linha
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning > Inlinestillbehör: Inlineslager; Inlinesbromsar; Spännen och remmar till inlines; Ramar till inlines; Monteringsdetaljer för inlines; Snören till inlines; Innerskor till inlines; Verktyg för inlines; Inlineshjul
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas > Peças para patins inline: Rolamentos para patins inline; Freios para patins inline; Presilhas e tiras para patins in-line; Bases para patins in-line; Ferragens para patins in-line; Cadarços para patins in-line; Botas internas para patins in-line; Ferramentas para patins in-line; Rodas para patins inline
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート > インラインスケート靴パーツ: インラインスケート靴ベアリング; インラインスケート靴ブレーキ; インラインスケート用バックル＆ストラップ; インラインスケート用フレーム; インラインスケート用ハードウェア; インラインスケート用シューレース; インラインスケート用ライナー; インラインスケート用ツール; インラインスケート靴ホイール
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje > Dijelovi rola: Ležajevi za role; Kočnice za role; Kopče i remeni za rolanje; Okviri za role; Oprema za rolanje; Vezice za role; Unutarnji ulošci za role; Alati za role; Kotačići za role
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu > Inline-rullaluistimien osat: Inline-rullaluistimien laakerit; Inline-rullaluistimien jarrut; Rullaluistimien soljet ja hihnat; Rullaluistimien kiskot; Rullaluistimien asennustarvikkeet; Rullaluistimien nauhat; Rullaluistimien sisäkengät; Rullaluistimien työkalut; Inline-rullaluistimien pyörät
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle > Díly na in-linové brusle: Ložiska pro in-linové brusle; Brzdy pro in-linové brusle; Přezky a pásky na inline brusle; Rámy inline bruslí; Montážní materiál na inline brusle; Tkaničky do inline bruslí; Vložky do inline bruslí; Nářadí na inline brusle; Kolečka pro in-linové brusle
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya > Inline-korcsolya-alkatrészek: Inline-korcsolya-csapágyak; Inline-korcsolya-fékek; Görkorcsolyacsatok és -pántok; Görkorcsolyasínek; Görkorcsolya hardverek; Görkorcsolyafűzők; Görkorcsolyabélések; Görkorcsolyaszerelési eszközök; Inline-korcsolya-kerekek
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต > อะไหล่โรลเลอร์เบลด: ตลับลูกปืนอินไลน์สเกต; เบรกอินไลน์สเกต; ตัวล็อกและสายรัดอินไลน์สเกต; เฟรมอินไลน์สเกต; อะไหล่และฮาร์ดแวร์อินไลน์สเกต; เชือกรองเท้าอินไลน์สเกต; รองเท้าชั้นในอินไลน์สเกต; เครื่องมืออินไลน์สเกต; ล้ออินไลน์สเกต
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller > Pièces de rollers: Roulements de rollers; Freins de rollers; Boucles et sangles de rollers en ligne; Platines de rollers en ligne; Visserie pour rollers en ligne; Lacets de rollers en ligne; Chaussons de rollers en ligne; Outils de rollers en ligne; Roues de rollers
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere > Reservedele til inlineskøjter: Inlineskøjter – lejer; Inlineskøjter – bremser; Spænder og stropper til inlineskøjter; Klinger til inlineskøjter; Hardware til inlineskøjter; Snørebånd til inlineskøjter; Linere til inlineskøjter; Værktøj til inlineskøjter; Inlineskøjter – hjul
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах > Детали для роликовых коньков: Подшипники для роликовых коньков; Тормоза для роликовых коньков; Бакли и ремни для роликовых коньков; Рамы для роликовых коньков; Крепеж для роликовых коньков; Шнурки для роликовых коньков; Лайнеры для роликовых коньков; Инструменты для роликовых коньков; Колеса для роликовых коньков
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰 > 直排轮滑部件: 直排轮滑鞋轴承; 直排轮滑鞋刹车; 直排轮滑鞋扣带与绑带; 直排轮滑鞋刀架; 直排轮滑鞋五金件; 直排轮滑鞋带; 直排轮滑鞋内胆; 直排轮滑鞋工具; 直排轮滑鞋滑轮
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach > Diely na kolieskové korčule: Ložiská na inline korčule; Brzdy na inline korčule; Pracky a popruhy na kolieskové korčule; Rámy pre inline korčule; Príslušenstvo na kolieskové korčule; Šnúrky do kolieskových korčúľ; Vnútorné vložky do kolieskových korčúľ; Náradie na inline korčule; Kolieska na inline korčule
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng > Phụ tùng trượt pa-tanh một hàng: Vòng bi trượt pa-tanh một hàng; Phanh trượt pa-tanh một hàng; Khóa & dây giày trượt patin; Khung giày trượt patin; Phụ kiện kim khí giày trượt patin; Dây buộc giày trượt patin; Lót giày trượt patin; Dụng cụ sửa giày trượt patin; Bánh xe trượt pa-tanh một hàng
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje > Deli za rolerje: Ležaji za rolerje; Zavore za rolerje; Zaponke in trakovi za rolerje; Okvirji za rolerje; Montažni deli za rolerje; Vezalke za rolerje; Notranji čevlji za rolerje; Orodja za rolerje; Kolesa za rolerje
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating > Inline Skate Parts: Inline Skate Bearings; Inline Skate Brakes; Inline Skate Buckles & Straps; Inline Skate Frames; Inline Skate Hardware; Inline Skate Laces; Inline Skate Liners; Inline Skate Tools; Inline Skate Wheels
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea > Piezas para patines en línea: Rodamientos para patines en línea; Frenos para patines en línea; Hebillas y correas para patines en línea; Guías para patines en línea; Tornillería para patines en línea; Cordones para patines en línea; Botines para patines en línea; Herramientas para patines en línea; Ruedas para patines en línea
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪 > 直排輪配件: 直排輪軸承; 直排輪煞車; 直排輪扣環與綁帶; 直排輪底座; 直排輪五金零件; 直排輪鞋帶; 直排輪內套; 直排輪工具; 直排輪滑輪
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach > Części do łyżworolek: Łożyska do łyżworolek; Hamulce do łyżworolek; Klamry i paski do rolek; Płozy do rolek; Elementy montażowe do rolek; Sznurowadła do rolek; Linery do rolek; Narzędzia do rolek; Kółka do łyżworolek
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile > Piese patine pentru pentru patinaj cu role în linie: Rulmenți patine pentru patinaj cu role în linie; Frâne patine cu role în linie; Catarame și curele pentru patine inline; Cadre pentru role; Componente pentru patine inline; Șireturi pentru role; Ghete interioare pentru role; Scule pentru role; Role patine cu role în linie
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅 > 인라인 스케이트 부품: 인라인 스케이트 베어링; 인라인 스케이트 브레이크; 인라인스케이트 버클 및 스트랩; 인라인스케이트 프레임; 인라인스케이트 하드웨어; 인라인스케이트 끈; 인라인스케이트 라이너; 인라인스케이트 툴; 인라인 스케이트 바퀴
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter > Deler til inline-skøyter: Kulelagre til inline-skøyter; Bremser til inline-skøyter; Spenner og stropper for inlineskøyter; Rammer for inlineskøyter; Monteringsdeler for inlineskøyter; Lisser for inlineskøyter; Innerstøvler for inlineskøyter; Verktøy for inlineskøyter; Hjul til inline-skøyter
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten > Onderdelen voor inlineskaten: Lagers voor inlineskaten; Remmen voor inlineskaten; Gespen en riempjes voor inline skates; Frames voor inline skates; Hardware voor inline skates; Veters voor inline skates; Liners voor inline skates; Gereedschap voor inline skates; Wielen voor inlineskaten
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten > Inline Paten Pedleri: Inline Paten Rulmanları; Inline Paten Frenleri; Sıralı paten toka ve kayışları; Sıralı paten çerçeveleri; Sıralı paten donanımları; Sıralı paten bağcıkları; Sıralı paten içlikleri; Sıralı paten aletleri; Inline Paten Tekerlekleri
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas > Ratukinių pačiūžų dalys: Ratukinių pačiūžų guoliai; Ratukinių pačiūžų stabdžiai; Riedučių sagtys ir dirželiai; Ratukinių pačiūžų rėmai; Riedučių atsarginės dalys ir tvirtinimo elementai; Ratukinių pačiūžų raišteliai; Ratukinių pačiūžų įdėklai; Ratukinių pačiūžų įrankiai; Ratukinių pačiūžų ratukai
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки > Протектори за каране на ролери: Лагери за ролери; Спирачки за ролери; Катарамки и каишки за ролкови кънки; Рамки за ролери; Крепежни елементи за ролкови кънки; Връзки за ролери; Вложки за ролери; Инструменти за ролери; Колела за ролери
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου > Ανταλλακτικά τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών: Ρουλεμάν τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών; Φρένα τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών; Κούμπωματα και ιμάντες για inline πατίνια; Σκελετοί για inline πατίνια; Εξαρτήματα για inline πατίνια; Κορδόνια για inline πατίνια; Επενδύσεις για inline πατίνια; Εργαλεία για inline πατίνια; Ροδάκια τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten > Inlineskate-Teile: Inlineskate-Kugellager; Inlineskate-Bremsen; Inline-Skate-Schnallen & -Riemen; Inline-Skate-Schienen; Inline-Skate-Hardware; Inline-Skate-Schnürsenkel; Inline-Skate-Innenschuhe; Inline-Skate-Werkzeuge; Inlineskate-Rollen